Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202664-404
Course of instruction; examination.

(1) Before registering as an online notary public, a notary public shall take a course of instruction and pass an examination approved by the Secretary of State. The course of instruction and examination shall be approved by the Secretary of State by July 31, 2020.

(2) The content of the course and the basis for the examination shall include notarial laws, procedures, technology, and the ethics of performing online notarial acts.

Laws 2019, LB186, § 4.